en: Toulouse sausages
de: Toulouser Würstchen
es: Salchichas de Toulouse
fr: Saucisses de Toulouse
hr: Toulouse kobasice
nl: Worsten uit Toulouse, Toulouseworsten

en: Cooked Toulouse sausage
fr: Saucisses de Toulouse cuites

en: Sausages from Savoy, Savoy sausages
fr: Saucisses savoyardes, Saucisses de Savoie
hr: Savojske kobasice
nl: Worst uit de Savoie

en: Viennese pork and veal sausages
fr: Saucisses viennoises

en: Smoked sausages
bg: Пушени колбаси
de: Räucherwürste
es: Salchichas ahumadas
fi: savustetut makkarat
fr: Saucisses fumées
hr: Dimljene kobasice
it: Salsicce affumicate
nl: Rookworsten, Gerookte worsten
pl: Kiełbasy wędzone, Kiełbasa wędzona

en: Truffled white pudding
fr: Boudin blanc truffé

en: Sautéed white pudding, Sautéed blood sausage
fr: Boudin blanc sauté, Boudin blanc poêlé

en: Black pudding
de: Blutwürste, Schwarzwürste, Schwarze Wurst
es: Morcilla
fi: Veripalttu
fr: Boudins noirs
hr: Crni puding
it: Sanguinaccio
ja: ブラッドソーセージ, ブラックプディング, モルシージャ, ブーダンノワール
nl: Bloedworsten

en: Refrigerated black pudding, Refrigerated blood sausage
fr: Boudin noir rayon frais

en: Sautéed black pudding
de: Gebratene Blutwurst
fr: Boudin noir sauté, Boudin noir poêlé
hr: Pirjani crni puding

en: Black pudding with onions
es: Morcillas con cebolla, Morcillas con cebollas
fi: Veripalttu sipuleilla
fr: Boudins noirs aux oignons, boudins noir aux oignons
hr: Crni puding s lukom
it: Sanguinaccio con cipolle
nl: Bloedworsten met ui

en: Black pudding with appel
fr: Boudins noirs aux pommes, Boudins noir aux pommes
hr: Crni puding s jabukama
nl: Bloedworsten met appel

en: kaszanka
pl: kaszanka

en: Game sausages
fr: Saucisses de gibier

en: Poultry hams, Cooked poultry breast slices
de: Geflügelschinken
fi: siipikarjakinkut
fr: Blancs de volaille en tranches, Jambons de volaille
hr: Šunke peradi
it: Prosciutti di pollame
nl: Gevogelte bilvlees

en: Cooked chicken breast slices, chicken ham
de: Hähnchen-brustfilet in Scheiben
es: Fiambre de pechuga de pollo, Pechuga de pollo cocida en lonchas
fi: kanaleikkele
fr: Blancs de poulet en tranches, Blancs de poulet, Blanc de poulet, Jambons de poulet, Jambon de poulet
hr: Kriške kuhanih pilećih prsa
it: Affettati di petto di pollo
nl: Gekookte gesneden kippenborsten
zh: 鸡火腿

en: Smoked chicken breast
fr: Blancs de poulet fumé, Blanc de poulet fumé
hr: Dimljena pileća prsa
nl: Gerookte kippenborst

en: Reconstituted chicken breast slices
fr: Blancs de poulet reconstitués

en: Cooked turkey breast slices, Turkey ham, cooked turkey breast
es: Fiambre de pechuga de pavo, Pechuga de pavo cocida en lonchas
fr: Blancs de dinde en tranches, blanc de dinde en tranche, jambon de dinde
hr: Kriške kuhanih purećih prsa

en: Reconstituted turkey breast slices
fr: Blancs de dinde reconstitués